Illinois, session 104th, HB4073.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Compensation Review Act is amended by 5adding Section 6.7 as follows: 6    (25 ILCS 120/6.7 new)7    Sec. 6.7. Cost-of-living adjustments prohibited. 8Notwithstanding any former or current provision of this Act, 9any other law, any report of the Compensation Review Board, or 10any resolution of the General Assembly to the contrary, in 11fiscal year 2026 and each fiscal year thereafter, members of 12the General Assembly are prohibited from receiving and shall 13not receive any increase in compensation that would otherwise 14apply based on a cost-of-living adjustment, as authorized by 15Senate Joint Resolution 192 of the 86th General Assembly. 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.